West Virginia, session 2026, HB4144.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. SALARY INCREASE FOR STATE EMPLOYEES. §5-5-2a. Granting annual Christmas bonuses to eligible state employees, if surplus revenues exceed $100 million annually. (a) Every eligible employee with three or more years of service shall receive an annual Christmas bonus equal to $500; if the state surplus revenue exceeds $100 million annually and funds are available for this bonus.(b) This annual Christmas bonus is in addition to any across-the-board, cost-of-living, or percentage salary increases which may be granted in any fiscal year by the Legislature.